Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.215

Facilitating recovery from Mt. St. Helens eruption—Precedence of court proceedings under RCW 43.01.210—Finality of order under RCW 8.04.070—Appeal.

(1) Court proceedings necessary to acquire property or property rights for purposes of RCW 43.01.210 take precedence over all other causes, including those expedited under the provisions of RCW 47.52.060, in all courts to the end that the provision of lands for dredge sites, dredge spoils sites, flood control works, or bank protection may be expedited.

(2) An order entered under RCW 8.04.070 relating to the acquisition of land under RCW 43.01.210 is final unless review of the order is taken to the supreme court within five days after entry of the order. Such an appeal shall be certified by the trial court to the supreme court. Upon certification, the supreme court shall assign the appeal for hearing at the earliest possible date, and it shall expedite its review and decision in every way possible.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 1 s 8.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.01.200.